Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.350

Citizens' exchange program.

The secretary of state, in consultation with the *department of trade, the department of agriculture, economic development consultants, the consular corps, and other international trade organizations, shall develop a Washington state citizens' exchange program that will initiate and promote:

(1) Citizen exchanges between Washington state agricultural, technical, and educational groups and organizations with their counterparts in targeted foreign countries.

(2) Expanded educational and training exchanges between Washington state individuals and organizations with similar groups in targeted foreign countries.

(3) Programs to extend Washington state expertise to targeted foreign countries to help promote better health and technical assistance in agriculture, water resources, hydroelectric power, forestry management, education, and other areas.

(4) Efforts where a special emphasis is placed on utilizing Washington state's rich human resources who are retired from public and private life and have the time to assist in this program.

(5) People-to-people programs that may result in increased tourism, business relationships, and trade from targeted foreign nations to the Pacific Northwest.

[ 1993 c 113 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The department of trade and economic development was the correct name for this department. The name of the department is now the department of community, trade, and economic development, pursuant to 1993 c 280. The "department of community, trade, and economic development" was renamed the "department of commerce" by 2009 c 565.